en: Brownies mixes
fr: Préparations pour Brownies

en: Base formulation for chocolate mousse, chocolate mousse kits
fr: Préparation pour mousse au chocolat

en: Mixes for dessert creams
fr: Préparations pour crèmes dessert
hr: Mješavine za desertne kreme
pl: Budyń w proszku

en: Mixes for panna cotta
fr: Préparations pour panna cotta
hr: Smjese za panna cottu
it: Misti per panna cotta

en: Mixes for jelly desserts
de: Götterspeisen Zubereitungen
es: Preparados para gelatina
fi: Hyytelöjauheet
fr: Préparations pour desserts gélifiés
hr: Mješavine za žele deserte
lt: Želė milteliai, Milteliai želė desertams
pl: Galaretka w proszku
pt: Preparados para gelatina

en: Mixes for kissel
pl: Kisiel w proszku

en: Pancake mixes, pancake mix
es: Mezcla para tortitas
fi: lettujauhot
hr: Smjese za palačinke
it: Preparato per pancake
lt: Blynų miltų mišiniai, Blynų mišiniai, Miltų mišiniai blynams
nl: Pancake mixes

de: Pfannkuchenmischung
fr: Préparations pour crêpes
nl: Pannenkoekenmixes

en: Filled cakes
de: Gefüllte Kuchen
fr: Gâteaux fourrés
hr: Punjene torte

en: Carrot cakes
es: Tarta de zanahoria
fr: Carrot cakes, gâteaux aux carottes
hr: Kolači od mrkve
ja: キャロットケーキ

en: Spit cakes
de: Spießkuchen, Spiesskuchen
fr: Gâteaux à la broche, Gâteau à la broche
hr: Pljuvačke kolače

en: Baumkuchen
xx: Baumkuchen
de: Baumkuchen
eo: Trunkkuko
ja: バウムクーヘン
lt: Baumkuchenas
nl: Baumkuchen
ru: Баумкухен

en: Šakotis
xx: Šakotis
lt: Šakotis, Šakočiai
pl: Sękacz

en: Stollen, Christstollen
xx: Stollen, Christstollen
de: Stollen, Christstollen

en: Plum cakes, Plum cake
it: Plum cakes, Plum cake

en: Filled sponge cake rolls
fr: Génoises roulées fourrées

en: Filled sponge cake slices
fr: Génoises en tranches fourrées

en: Fairy cakes, Cupcake, Bun
xx: Cupcakes

en: Black Forest gâteau, Black Forest cake, Chocolate sponge cake with cherry, Chocolate sponge cake without cherry
de: Schwarzwälder Kirschtorte, Schwarzwälderkirschtorte, Schwarzwäldertorte
es: Pastel de la Selva Negra, Torta Selva Negra, Tarta Selva Negra
fr: Forêt-noires, Forêts noires, Gâteau au chocolat type forêt noire, Génoise au chocolat et crème multi-couches avec cerises, Génoise au chocolat et crème multi-couches sans cerises
hr: Crna šuma gâteau
it: Torta della Foresta Nera
ja: ブラックフォレストケーキ, シュヴァルツヴェルダー・キルシュトルテ
lt: Šokoladiniai biskvitai su vyšniomis
nl: Schwarzwälder Kirschtaarten

en: Sponge cakes, Sponge cake
fr: Génoise, Gâteau moelleux nature
hr: Biskvit kolači
ja: スポンジケーキ
lt: Biskvitiniai tortai